Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,165
Registration; noncompliance; citation; effect.

If a citation is issued to an owner or operator of a motor vehicle or trailer for a violation of section 60-362 and the owner properly registers and licenses the motor vehicle or trailer not in compliance and pays all taxes and fees due and the owner or operator provides proof of such registration to the prosecuting attorney within ten days after the issuance of the citation, no prosecution for the offense cited shall occur.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 165.